California, session 20252026, SB108.
do enact as follows: SECTION 1. Item 0840-001-3268 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0840-001-3268—For support of the Controller, payable from the Senior Citizens and Disabled Citizens Property Tax Postponement Fund ........................ 2,792,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 2,792,000 Provisions: 1. The funding provided in this item shall cover costs for personal services and related operating expenses and equipment for administration of the Property Tax Postponement Program. The continuous appropriation pursuant to Section 16180 of the Government Code from the Senior Citizens and Disabled Citizens Property Tax Postponement Fund is allowed for property tax payments to counties and other direct program costs, such as the cost of title searches and appraisals incurred by the Controller covering real property held in the name of an account, or legal costs associated with the enforcement and administration of the Property Tax Postponement Program. No moneys from the fund, beyond those appropriated in this item, shall be used for personal services and related operating expenses and equipment. 2. Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 16180 of the Government Code, on a one-time basis in the 2025–26 fiscal year, property tax postponement disbursements from the continuous appropriation of the Senior Citizens and Disabled Citizens Property Tax Postponement Fund may exceed 1 percent of the amount available in the fund for residential dwellings that are manufactured homes. SEC. 2. Item 4140-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4140-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Health Care Access and Information ........................ 140,253,000165,253,000 Schedule: (1) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 36,133,000 (1.5) 3831-Health Care Quality and Affordability ........................ 100,620,000 (2) 3840-Facilities Development ........................ 3,500,000 (3) 3845-Cal-Mortgage Loan Insurance ........................ 25,000,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between this item and Item 4140-001-0001 to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. 2. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $18,667,000 is available to fund grant awards for existing primary care residency slots, up to $3,333,000 is available to fund new primary care residency slots at existing residency programs, and up to $5,667,000 is available to fund primary care residency slots for existing teaching health centers under the Song-Brown Health Care Workforce Training Act (Article 1 (commencing with Section 128200) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code). Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $3,333,000 is available to fund newly accredited primary care residency programs and, as of June 30, 2027, unspent amounts may be redirected to fund new residency slots at existing programs if newly accredited primary care residency programs have not been established. Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $333,000 is available for the State Loan Repayment Program. (b) The funds described in Provision 2 are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,800,000 shall be available to support the California Medicine Scholars Program. These funds shall continue to be appropriated annually. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $3,000,000 shall be available to the Northeast Valley Health Corporation for infrastructure improvements and expansion. 6. Of the amounts appropriated in Schedule (2), $500,000 shall be available to the American Reproductive Centers Fertility Clinic in Palm Springs for repairs and structure improvements. 7. Of the amounts appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,000,000 shall be available to the Youth Mental Health Academy for a Los Angeles cohort. 8. The Department of Health Care Access and Information shall continue to seek regular stakeholder input from members of the formal Advisory Workgroup until June 30, 2026. The Advisory Workgroup shall be composed of a majority of active community health workers, Promotores and Promotores de Salud, or their representatives or representative organizations. The Advisory Workgroup may advise the department on current and future policy recommendations regarding the community health worker and promotores workforce. These recommendations may include, but are not limited to, issues related to career development, organizational capacity building, access to and delivery of training, and standards for certification or program accreditation. 9. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $90,000,000 is available for funding grants to family planning providers for the provision of family planning services and family planning-related services, as described in subdivision (n) of, and paragraph (8) of subdivision (aa) of, Section 14132 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. (b) The Department of Health Care Access and Information, in consultation with the California Health and Human Services Agency, shall determine the methodology and distribution of the grant funds appropriated for the purposes described in this provision. An application for a grant under this provision shall include justification for the amount of grant funds requested, as determined by the Department of Health Care Access and Information. (c) Eligible recipients of grant funds are limited to community clinics licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code that provide family planning and family planning-related services and that demonstrate they are subject to an elimination of federal financial participation on or after July 4, 2025. (d) Up to $1,500,000 appropriated in this item may be used for state operations, and transferred to Item 4140-001-0001, and allocated to a third-party administrator through a grant or contract, to support the administration of the grant program. (e) The Department of Health Care Access and Information may execute grants and contracts, including exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts and grants entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual. (f) Contracts, grants, and related information created or obtained pursuant to this provision shall not be made public and are exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). The Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest: in order to protect confidential and personal medical information, the safety of medical providers, and access to reproductive health and family planning services, it is necessary that grants, contracts, and related information created or obtained pursuant to this provision are exempt from disclosure. 10. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), up to $25,000,000 is available for the Department of Health Care Access and Information to provide grants to hospitals in immediate and significant financial distress to help prevent the closure of those hospitals. (b) Hospitals applying for grant funds shall meet specified criteria as of April 15, 2026, including, but not limited to, the following: (1) Have less than 10 days’ cash on hand, inclusive of all investments and liquid assets that can be used for operations, based on the internally prepared financial statements for the most recent closed month, and substantiated by the most recent available audited financial statements. (2) Have demonstrated best efforts to exhaust other financial options, including, but not limited to, resolving outstanding revenue timing issues or requesting forgiveness or deferral of other short- and long-term debt. (3) More than 50 percent of the hospital’s payer mix is composed of government payors and uninsured patients. (4) Be a not-for-profit hospital or public hospital. “Not-for-profit hospital” means the same as a general acute care hospital described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 15432 of the Government Code that is organized as a not-for-profit entity. “Public hospital” means a hospital that is licensed to a county, a city, a city and county, the University of California, a local health care district, a local health authority, or a municipal hospital established pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 37600) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 4 of the Government Code. (5) Any other criteria as determined by the Department of Health Care Access and Information, in consultation with the Department of Finance. (c) The Department of Health Care Access and Information may execute grants and contracts, including exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts and grants entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. (d) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the California Health Facilities Financing Authority and the Department of Health Care Access and Information may implement, interpret, or make specific the requirements of this provision, in whole or in part, by means of information notices or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. (e) Any unencumbered funds pursuant to this provision shall revert to the General Fund as of June 30, 2026. SEC. 3. Section 39.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: SEC. 39.00. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the following bills are other bills providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution: AB 116, AB 117, AB 118, AB 119, AB 120, AB 121, AB 122, AB 123, AB 124, AB 125, AB 126, AB 127, AB 128, AB 129, AB 130, AB 131, AB 132, AB 133, AB 134, AB 135, AB 136, AB 137, AB 138, AB 139, AB 140, AB 141, AB 143, AB 144, AB 145, AB 146, AB 147, AB 148, AB 149, AB 150, AB 151, AB 152, AB 153, AB 154, AB 155, AB 156, AB 157, AB 158, AB 159, AB 160, AB 161, AB 162, SB 116, SB 117, SB 118, SB 119, SB 120, SB 121, SB 122, SB 123, SB 124, SB 125, SB 126, SB 127, SB 128, SB 129, SB 130, SB 131, SB 132, SB 133, SB 134, SB 135, SB 136, SB 137, SB 138, SB 139, SB 140, SB 141, SB 143, SB 144, SB 145, SB 146, SB 147, SB 148, SB 149, SB 150, SB 151, SB 152, SB 153, SB 154, SB 155 SB 156, SB 157, SB 158, SB 159, SB 160, SB 161, and SB 162. SEC. 4. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2025 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 101). (b) Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 102). (c) Chapter 77 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 104). (d) Chapter 104 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 105). (e) Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2026 (Senate Bill No. 106). (f) Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2026 (Assembly Bill No. 107). SEC. 5. This act is a Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall take effect immediately. SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact statutory changes relating to the Budget Act of 2025.